Idaho, session 2026, H0595.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 1, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-144, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-144. CARDIAC EMERGENCY RESPONSE PROGRAM. (1) As used in this sec-
tion:
(a) "Automated external defibrillator" or "AED" means a lightweight,
portable device that delivers an electric shock through the chest to the
heart. The shock can potentially stop an irregular heartbeat and allow
a normal rhythm to resume following cardiac arrest.
(b) "Cardiac arrest" means any event that occurs when the heart mal-
functions and stops beating unexpectedly, which if not treated within
minutes quickly leads to death.
(c) "Cardiac emergency response plan" or "CERP" means a written docu-
ment that establishes the specific steps to reduce death from cardiac
arrest in any setting.
(d) "School" means all public school districts and public charter
schools in the state of Idaho.
(2) The state department of education shall collaborate with school
district leadership and the Idaho high school activities association to
develop and provide guidelines for a cardiac emergency response plan and
incorporation of cardiac emergency response plans into current emergency
response policies.
(3)(a) Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, each school shall de-
velop a CERP addressing the appropriate use of school personnel to re-
spond to incidents involving an individual experiencing cardiac arrest
or similar life-threatening emergencies on school grounds.
(b) All CERPs shall incorporate evidence-based standards and core ele-
ments recommended by nationally recognized bodies, such as those recom-
mended by the american heart association or other organizations focused
on emergency cardiovascular care.
(c) AEDs shall be placed in accordance with the CERP on school grounds
and facilities in an unlocked and accessible location so as to have the
ability to be placed on a victim within three (3) minutes of recognition
of sudden cardiac arrest.
(d) AEDs shall be tested and maintained in accordance with manufacturer
guidelines, and all maintenance records and information regarding the


device may be provided to emergency medical services and other first re-
sponders and emergency response workers.
(e) Appropriate school staff shall be trained in first aid, CPR, and
AED use that follows evidence-based guidelines set forth by the ameri-
can heart association or an organization focused on emergency cardio-
vascular care. Staff trained shall be determined by the CERP, including
but not limited to coaches, school nurses, health and physical educa-
tion instructors, athletic trainers, and administrators.
(4)(a) Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, each school with an
athletic department or organized athletic program or participating in
organized athletics shall develop a CERP that addresses the appropriate
use of school personnel to respond to incidents involving an individual
experiencing cardiac arrest or a similar life-threatening emergency
while attending or participating in an athletic practice or event while
on school grounds or school athletic facilities that are venue-spe-
cific.
(b) An AED shall be clearly marked and easily accessible in an unlocked
location at each school athletic venue and event. The AED shall be ac-
cessible during any school-sponsored athletic event or team practice in
which pupils of the school are participating.
(c) AEDs shall be tested and maintained in accordance with manufacturer
guidelines, and all maintenance records and information regarding the
device may be provided to emergency medical services and other first re-
sponders and emergency response workers.
(d) All coaches shall obtain and maintain training in CPR, first aid,
and the use of AEDs. Certification in CPR and AED use shall be consis-
tent with national evidence-based emergency cardiovascular care guide-
lines.
(5) The state department of education or local school board may estab-
lish a procedure for monitoring adherence to the requirements set forth in
this section.
(6) A local school board may accept gifts, grants, and donations, in-
cluding in-kind donations, designated for the purchase of an AED that meets
the standards established by the United States food and drug administration
and for the costs incurred to inspect and maintain such device and train
staff in the use of such device.
(7) All persons administering or adhering to this section shall be im-
mune from civil liability in accordance with chapter 7, title 39, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.